Louisiana, session 2026, HB1027.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. R.S. 40:1581(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
8 §1581. Smoke detectors; carbon monoxide detectors; one- or two-family dwellings
9 * * *
10 F. The real estate agent and the licensed real estate appraiser shall not be
11 liable for the seller's failure to comply with the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.